Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-3764
Commission; cooperate with University of Nebraska and other organizations; purpose.

The commission shall not set up research or development units or agencies of its own but shall limit its activity to cooperation and contracts with the University of Nebraska Institute of Agriculture and Natural Resources and other local, state, or national organizations, public or private, in carrying out the purposes of the Dry Bean Resources Act.

Laws 1987, LB 145, § 30.